Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB727.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 102. Definitions.--When used in this act the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:* * *"ACT test." A standardized test for the assessment of 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 college readiness administered by ACT.* * *Section 2. Section 121(a), (c) introductory paragraph and (1), (c.1) introductory paragraph, (1), (2) introductory paragraph, (iii) and (iv), (3) introductory paragraph and (ii)(C) and (4), (c.2)(1) introductory paragraph and (i), (c.3) introductory paragraph, (2)(i)(A) and (4), (c.4) introductory paragraph, (c.7), (c.8), (c.9) and (c.11)(5)(i) and the definitions of "ACT" and "approved alternative assessment" in subsection (d) of the act are amended to read:Section 121. Keystone Exams and Graduation Requirements.--(a) The department shall develop and implement Keystone Exams in algebra I, literature and biology. [The State Board of Education shall promulgate or revise regulations, subject to the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the "Regulatory Review Act," necessary to implement this section.] By July 1, 2027, the department shall approve the ACT test to be used for evaluating student performance in algebra I, literature and biology. After July 1, 2027, the implementation of the Keystone Exam shall cease.* * *(c) Notwithstanding section 2604-B(b)(2)(v), 22 Pa. Code § 4.24 or 4.51 or any statute or regulation to the contrary, in any school year in which a demonstration of proficiency on a Keystone Exam or ACT test is required for high school graduation, a CTE Concentrator shall be deemed proficient provided that the CTE Concentrator shall meet all of the following requirements:(1) completes locally established grade-based requirements for academic content areas associated with each Keystone Exam or 20250HB0727PN0748 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ACT test on which the CTE Concentrator did not achieve proficiency. For the purposes of this paragraph, completion of grade-based requirements in any science and technology and environment and ecology course shall satisfy the requirements for the academic content area associated with the Keystone Exam or ACT test in biology; and* * *(c.1) Notwithstanding section 2604-B(b)(2)(v), 22 Pa. Code § 4.24, 4.51 or 4.51c or any statute or regulation to the contrary, in any school year in which a demonstration of proficiency on a Keystone Exam or ACT test is required for high school graduation, a student shall be deemed proficient if the student demonstrates one of the following:(1) Attainment of a satisfactory composite score under subsection (c.2) on the Keystone Exams or ACT test in algebra I, literature and biology.(2) Successful completion of locally established, grade-based requirements for academic content areas associated with each Keystone Exam or ACT test on which the student did not achieve at least a proficient score and demonstration of one of the following:* * *(iii) Attainment of an established score on an Advanced Placement Program exam in an academic content area associated with each Keystone Exam or ACT test on which the student did not achieve at least a proficient score.(iv) Attainment of an established score on an International Baccalaureate Diploma Program exam in an academic content area associated with each Keystone Exam or ACT test on which the student did not achieve at least a proficient score.20250HB0727PN0748 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(3) Successful completion of locally established, grade-based requirements for academic content areas associated with each Keystone Exam or ACT test on which the student did not achieve at least a proficient score and demonstration of three pieces of evidence that reflect readiness for meaningful postsecondary engagement consistent with the student's goals and career plan, which shall include:* * *(ii) Two additional pieces of evidence from a list established by the secretary and approved by the State Board of Education, which shall include, but not be limited to:* * *(C) Attainment of a score of proficient or advanced on a Keystone Exam or ACT test.* * *(4) For the purposes of this subsection, completion of grade-based requirements in any science and technology and environment and ecology course shall satisfy the requirements for the academic content area associated with the Keystone Exam or ACT test in biology.(c.2) (1) No later than July 30, [2019] 2027, the secretary shall recommend, and the State Board of Education shall approve, the satisfactory composite score a student must attain in order to meet the requirements of this section. The satisfactory composite score established under this paragraph shall:(i) Require a student to achieve at least a proficient score on at least one of the three Keystone Exams or ACT test and no less than a basic score on the two remaining Keystone Exams or ACT tests.20250HB0727PN0748 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(c.3) A chief school administrator may grant a waiver of the requirements for demonstrations of proficiency on the Keystone Exams or ACT tests or the requirements of subsection (c) or (c.1) for a student in grade twelve or to accommodate a student who experiences extenuating circumstances. The following shall apply:* * *(2) If the waivers granted by a chief school administrator exceed five percent (5%) of students in the graduating class in two (2) consecutive school years, the following shall occur:(i) The department shall conduct an audit of the school entity to assess the following:(A) The alignment of the coursework offered by the school entity with the State academic standards assessed by each Keystone Exam or ACT test.* * *(4) Each student granted a waiver under this subsection shall complete locally established, grade-based requirements for academic content areas associated with each Keystone Exam or ACT test.* * *(c.4) A school entity may offer supplemental instruction to a student who does not demonstrate at least proficiency on a Keystone Exam or ACT test or on a locally validated assessment under 22 Pa. Code § 4.24. The supplemental instruction:* * *(c.7) A student who achieves a score of proficient or advanced on a Keystone Exam or ACT test shall only be permitted to retake the exam if the student or parent submits a request in 20250HB0727PN0748 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 writing to the school entity.(c.8) When a student transfers from an out-of-State school to a school entity in this Commonwealth, the student's school entity shall determine whether the student's performance on out-of-State coursework and assessments that are aligned with the State academic standards assessed by each Keystone Exam or ACT test satisfy the requirements of this section.(c.9) The performance level demonstrated in each of the State academic standards, including the highest performance level demonstrated by a student on the associated Keystone Exam or ACT test, may be included on a student's transcript as determined by each school entity.* * *(c.11) No later than December 1, 2022, and each December 1 thereafter, each school entity shall submit a report to the department which shall be posted by January 15 of each year on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The report shall contain, at a minimum, the following:* * *(5) Total number of students who graduated by demonstrating proficiency under each of the following:(i) the achievement of the required score on all three (3) Keystone Exams or ACT tests;* * *(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *["ACT." A standardized test for the assessment of college readiness administered by ACT.]20250HB0727PN0748 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *"Approved alternative assessment." A SAT, PSAT, ACT test or Armed Services Vocational Aptitude Battery test.* * *Section 3. Sections 121.1 and 1073.1(a)(3) of the act are amended to read:Section 121.1. Special Provisions Applicable to the Keystone Exams, ACT tests, Graduation Requirements and Alternative Competency Assessment.--(a) For the 2019-2020 school year and any subsequent school year in which the Federal Government has waived the testing and accountability requirements of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (Public Law 89-10, 20 U.S.C. § 6301 et seq.), as amended by the Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95, 129 Stat. 1802), any student who completed a course in an academic content area associated with a Keystone Exam or ACT test shall not be required to take the Keystone Exam or ACT test related to that course and shall be deemed proficient for purposes of sections 121 and 2604-B(b)(2)(v) and 22 Pa. Code § 4.24 (relating to high school graduation requirements), provided that the student demonstrates successful completion of locally established, grade-based requirements for the academic content areas associated with each Keystone Exam or ACT test.(b) Notwithstanding section 2604-B(b)(2)(v), 22 Pa. Code § 4.24, 4.51 (relating to state assessment system) or 4.51c (relating to project-based assessment) or any statute or regulation to the contrary, in any school year in which a demonstration of proficiency on a Keystone Exam or ACT test is required for high school graduation, a student subject to this section shall be deemed proficient if the student meets all of 20250HB0727PN0748 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the following requirements:(1) Demonstrates attainment of a satisfactory composite score of at least 2939, using the highest scores attained by the student on two of the three Keystone Exams or ACT tests in algebra I, literature and biology.(2) Achieves a minimum score of proficient on at least one of the two Keystone Exams or ACT tests and a minimum score of basic on the other Keystone Exam or ACT test used to calculate the composite score under paragraph (1).Section 1073.1. Performance Review.--(a) In addition to any other requirements provided for under this act, the employment contract for a district superintendent or assistant district superintendent shall include objective performance standards mutually agreed to in writing by the board of school directors and the district superintendent or assistant district superintendent. The objective performance standards may be based upon the following:* * *(3) achievement on Keystone Exams or ACT tests;* * *Section 4. The definitions of "assessment" and "data-available teacher" in section 1138.1 of the act are amended to read:Section 1138.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Assessment." The Pennsylvania System of School Assessment test, the Keystone Exams, or ACT tests or another test established or approved by the State Board of Education or 20250HB0727PN0748 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approved by an act of the General Assembly to meet the requirements of section 2603-B(d)(10)(i) and the requirements of the Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95, 129 Stat. 1802) or its successor statute or required to achieve other standards established by the department for the school or school district.* * *"Data-available teacher." A classroom teacher who is a professional employee teaching English, language arts, mathematics, science or other content areas as assessed by an assessment, including the Pennsylvania System of School Assessment [and], Keystone Exams and ACT tests.* * *Section 5. Section 1331.1(c)(5) of the act is amended to read:Section 1331.1. Assisting Students Experiencing Education Instability.--* * *(c) A school entity shall work to ensure that a student experiencing education instability graduates in a timely manner. The following shall apply:* * *(5) After exhausting all other options under this section, a student who has successfully satisfied the requirements of section 121(c), (c.1) or (c.3) in any school year in which demonstration of proficiency on a Keystone Exam or ACT test is required for high school graduation, but who cannot obtain a diploma from a receiving school entity, shall as a last resort be eligible to obtain a Statewide secondary school diploma, known as the Keystone Diploma, issued by the department. The point of contact shall assist the student in obtaining the 20250HB0727PN0748 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Keystone Diploma.* * *Section 6. The definition of "State assessment" in section 1502-I of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1502-I. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"State assessment." Any of the following:* * *(2.1) The ACT tests.* * *Section 7. The definition of "assessment" in section 2002-B of the act is amended to read:Section 2002-B. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Assessment." The Pennsylvania System of School Assessment test, the Keystone Exam, an ACT test, an equivalent local assessment or another test established or approved by the State Board of Education or the General Assembly to meet the requirements of section 2603-B(d)(10)(i), or required under the Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95, 129 Stat. 1802) or its successor statute or another test required to achieve other standards established by the Department of Education for the public school or school district under 22 Pa. Code § 403.3 (relating to single accountability system).20250HB0727PN0748 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 8. All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with the provisions of this act.Section 9. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Section 8 of this act shall take effect July 1, 2027, or immediately, whichever is later.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0727PN0748 - 11 - 123456789